Massachusetts, session 194th, H2792.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the
contrary, Brian P. Costello Jr. shall be deemed eligible for the alternative superannuation
retirement benefit enacted by Section 2 of Chapter 114 of the Acts of 2000, known as Retirement
Plus, so called, provided that the member pays into said retirement system an amount that is
commensurate with what he would have paid under retirement plus, minus the contributions that
the member has already paid into the retirement system for said period, plus regular interest; and
provided further, that the Board shall then recalculate Brian P. Costello Jr.’s superannuation
retirement allowance using the formula for said alternative superannuation retirement benefit,
and he shall then be deemed entitled to said alternative superannuation retirement benefit
retroactively to the date of his superannuation retirement.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2